Washington statutes.
RCW 41.24.330

Emergency medical service districts—Board of trustees—Creation.

An emergency medical service district board of trustees is created to administer this chapter in every county maintaining a regularly organized emergency medical service district. The emergency medical service district board shall consist of two of the members of the county legislative authority or their designees, the county auditor or the auditor's designee, the head of the emergency medical service district, and one emergency worker from the emergency medical service district to be elected by the emergency workers of the emergency medical service district for a term of one year and annually thereafter.

The emergency medical service district shall make provisions for the collection and payment of the fees provided under this chapter and shall continue to make such provisions for all emergency workers who come under this chapter as long as they shall continue to be members of the fire department.

[ 1999 c 148 s 29; 1993 c 331 s 2.]